test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenses_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Verb - бимӣ: # быть irregular
    бимӣ+V+IV+Inf: бимӣ
    бимӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: бисим

  Verb - са̄мӣ: # знать vowel
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Inf: са̄мӣ
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Inf: са̄мӣ
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: са̄м
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: са̄нни
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: са̄ран
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: са̄рав
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl12: са̄рап
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: са̄рас
    са̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: са̄ра

  Verb - тэтывмӣ: # одеть voiced cns
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Inf: тэтывмӣ
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: тэтывум
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: тэтывунни
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: тэтыврэн
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: тэтыврэв
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl12: тэтыврэп
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: тэтыврэс
    тэтывмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: тэтыврэ

  Verb - исмӣ: # доити voiceless cns
    исмӣ+V+IV+Inf: исмӣ 
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: исим
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: исинни
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: истан
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: истав
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl12: истап
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: истас
    исмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: иста

  Verb - ме̄лмӣ: # проснуться л
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Inf: ме̄лмӣ 
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ме̄лим
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ме̄линни
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ме̄ллан
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ме̄ллав
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl12: ме̄ллап
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ме̄ллас
    ме̄лмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ме̄лла

  Verb - уӈмӣ: # послать м, ӈ
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Inf: уӈмӣ 
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: уӈим
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: уӈинни
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: уӈнэн
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: уӈнэв
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl12: уӈнэп
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: уӈнэс
    уӈмӣ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: уӈнэ

  Verb - гунмӣ: # сказать voiceless cns
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Inf: гунмӣ 
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: гуним
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: гунинни
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: гунэн
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: гунэв
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl12: гунэп
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: гунэс
    гунмӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: гунэ

  Verb - о̄мӣ: # делать
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Inf: о̄мӣ
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: о̄ча̄в
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: о̄ча̄с
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: о̄ча̄н
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: о̄ча̄вун
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl12: о̄ча̄т
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [о̄ча̄сун, о̄ча̄хун]
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: о̄ча̄тын
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Sg1: о̄ӈкив
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Sg2: о̄ӈкис
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Sg3: о̄ӈкин
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Pl1: о̄ӈкивун
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Pl12: о̄ӈкит
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Pl2: [о̄ӈкисун, о̄ӈкихун]
    о̄мӣ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Iter+Pl3: о̄ӈкитын
    
